Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.350

Bail.

Unless the offense with which the prisoner is charged is shown to be an offense punishable by death or life imprisonment under the laws of the state in which it was committed, a judge or magistrate in this state may admit the person arrested to bail by bond, with sufficient sureties, and in such sum as he or she deems proper, conditioned for his or her appearance before him or her at a time specified in such a bond, and for his or her surrender, to be arrested upon the warrant of the governor of this state.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1078; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 16.]